src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs

!dtí+Verb+PresSubj:dtí	#;	! in "go dtí" dtí is *not* a verb 
				! but is part of compound preposition (/Sp /Ns?)
!!
!! DEFECTIVE VERBS
!!
arsa+Verb+PastInd:arsa	#;
arsa+Verb+PastInd:ars'	#;
ar+Verb+PastInd:ar	#;
dar+Verb+PresInd:dar	#;
dóbair+Verb+PastInd:dóbair	#;
hóbair+Verb+PastInd:hóbair	#;
fainic+Verb+Imper+2P+Sg:fainic	#;

feadair+Verb+PresInd:feadair	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+Neg+Len:fheadair	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg+Neg+Len:fheadar	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg+Emph+Neg+Len:fheadarsa	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg+Neg+Len:fheadraís	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg+Emph+Neg+Len:fheadraís-se	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl+Neg+Len:fheadramar	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl+Emph+Neg+Len:fheadramarna	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+Q+Ecl:bhfeadair	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg+Q+Ecl:bhfeadar	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Sg+Emph+Q+Ecl:bhfeadarsa	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg+Q+Ecl:bhfeadraís	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+2P+Sg+Emph+Q+Ecl:bhfeadraís-se	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl+Q+Ecl:bhfeadramar	#;
feadair+Verb+PresInd+1P+Pl+Emph+Q+Ecl:bhfeadramarna	#;

!! SOME COMMON COMPOUNDS
!! leave out _fios from lemma as it prevents some bí CG rules applying
!!bí_fios+Verb+PresInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:tá's	#;
!!bí_fios+Verb+PastInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bhí's	#;
!!bí_fios+Verb+PresInd+Neg+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:níl's	#;
bí+Verb+PresInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:tá's	#;
bí+Verb+PastInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bhí's	#;
bí+Verb+PresInd+Neg+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:níl's	#;
!!
!! IRREGULAR VERBS
!!
abair:0			VI1;	! say

beir:0			VI2;	! catch, give birth to

clois+Verb+VTI:0	VI3;	! hear

ith+Verb+VTI+Vow:0		VI4;	! eat

tabhair+Verb+VD:0	VI5;	! give				WAS VTI
				! also .. thug sé orthu/faoi

tar+Verb+VI:0		VI6;	! come

téigh+Verb+VTI:0	VI7;	! go

feic+Verb+VTI:0		VI8;	! see
chí+CM+Verb+VTI:0	VI8a;	! see: Munster variation
tchí+CU+Verb+VTI:0	VI8b;	! see: Ulster variation

déan+Verb+VT:0		VI9;	! do, make    			WAS VTI
dein+CM+Verb+VT:0	VI9a;	! do, make: Munster variation	WAS VTI
				! also .. ag déanamh air ...

faigh+Verb+VT:0		VI10;	! get
geibh+CM+Verb+VT:0	VI10a;	! get: Munster variation

bí+Verb+VI:0		VI11;	! be

is:0			VI12;	! copula

!**************************************************************************
 
LEXICON VI1	! ABAIR (Irregular)

!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood

+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresInd:0	VI1-PresInd;	
+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresImp:0	VI1-PresImp;	
+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastInd:0	VI1-PastInd;
+Verb+VTI+Vow+FutInd:0	VI1-FutInd;
+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp:0	VI1-PastImp/PastSubj;	

!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+Verb+VTI+Vow+Cond:0		VI1-Cond;	

!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood

+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresSubj:0	VI1-PresSubj;	
!!!!!!+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastSubj:0	VI1-PastImp/PastSubj;

!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood

+Verb+VTI+Vow+Imper:0	VI1-Imper;	


LEXICON VI1-PresImp		! Present Tense Habitual - Aimsir Gnáth Láithreach
0:deireann		SufNegQ;		! deireann 3rd person sing only

LEXICON VI1-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:deir		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:deirim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:deirimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:deirimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:deirimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:deirtear	NegQ;		! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:dheireas	#;		! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar

+Rel:adeir			#;		! variation (rel?) on deir (above)
+1P+Sg+Rel:adeirim		#;
+1P+Sg+Rel+Emph:adeirimse	#;
+1P+Pl+Rel:adeirimid		#;
+1P+Pl+Rel+Emph:adeirimidne	#;
+Auto+Rel:adeirtear		#;

LEXICON VI1-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

0:dúirt		NegQIrreg;		
+1P+Sg:duart	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Sg+Emph:duartsa	NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg:dúraís	NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg+Emph:dúraís-se	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl:dúramar	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl+Emph:dúramarna	NegQIrreg;
+2P+Pl:dúrabhair	NegQIrreg;
+2P+Pl+Emph:dúrabhairne	NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl:dúradar	NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl+Emph:dúradarsan	NegQIrreg;
+Auto:dúradh	NegQIrreg;		

LEXICON VI1-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:déarfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:déarfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:déarfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:déarfar		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:dhéarfas		#;		

LEXICON VI1-PastImp/PastSubj	! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:deireadh		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Sg:deirinn		NegQIrreg;	! Past Subj. - Aimsir Foshuiteach Caite
+1P+Sg+Emph:deirinnse		NegQIrreg;	! Past Subj. - Aimsir Foshuiteach Caite
+2P+Sg:deirteá		NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg+Emph:deirteása		NegQIrreg;
!!!!+3P+Sg:deireadh		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl:deirimis		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl+Emph:deirimisne		NegQIrreg;
!!!+2P+Pl:deireadh		NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl:deiridís		NegQIrreg;
+Auto:deirtí 		NegQIrreg;		

+Rel:adeireadh			#;
+1P+Sg+Rel:adeirinn		#;	! Past Imperfect/Subj. (Relative?) - Aimsir Gnáth/Foshuiteach Caite
+2P+Sg+Rel:adeirteá		#;
+2P+Sg+Rel+Emph:adeirteása	#;
!!!!+3P+Sg+Rel:adeireadh	#;
+1P+Pl+Rel:adeirimis		#;
+1P+Pl+Rel+Emph:adeirimisne	#;
!!!+2P+Pl+Rel:adeireadh		#;
+3P+Pl+Rel:adeiridís		#;
+Auto+Rel:deirtí 		#;		

LEXICON VI1-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach
0:déarfadh		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Sg:déarfainn	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Sg+Emph:déarfainnse	NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg:déarfá		NegQIrreg;
+2P+Sg+Emph:déarfása		NegQIrreg;
!!+3P+Sg:déarfadh		NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl:déarfaimis	NegQIrreg;
+1P+Pl+Emph:déarfaimisne	NegQIrreg;
!!+2P+Pl:déarfadh		NegQIrreg;
+3P+Pl:déarfaidís	NegQIrreg;
+Auto:déarfaí 		NegQIrreg;		


LEXICON VI1-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:deire			NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:deirimid		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:deirimidne		NegSubj;
+Auto:deirtear		NegSubj;		


LEXICON VI1-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:abraim	NegImper;
+1P+Sg+Emph:abraimse	NegImper;
+2P+Sg:abair	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:abradh	NegImper;
+1P+Pl:abraimis	NegImper;
+1P+Pl+Emph:abraimisne	NegImper;
+2P+Pl:abraigí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:abraidís	NegImper;
+Auto:abairtear NegImper;



!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI2	! BEIR (Irregular)


+Verb+VTI+PresInd:0	VI2-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+Verb+VTI+PastInd:0	VI2-PastInd;
+Verb+VTI+FutInd:0	VI2-FutInd;
+Verb+VTI+PastImp:0	VI2-PastImp;


+Verb+VTI+Cond:0		VI2-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood


+Verb+VTI+PresSubj:0	VI2-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+VTI+PastSubj:0	VI2-PastSubj;


+Verb+VTI+Imper:0	VI2-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI2-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:beireann	SufNegQ;
!!0:beireanns	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:beirim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:beirimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:beirimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beirimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:beirtear	NegQ;		! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:bheireas	#;

LEXICON VI2-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!changed from NegQ to NegQ2 may 2012 (eud) 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!this assumes that rug is lenited in past tense like reg. verbs rith etc.
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!therefore there will not be 2 forms generated (with and without +Len)
0:rug		NegQ2;		
+1P+Sg:rugas	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:rugas-sa	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:rugais	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:rugais-se	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:rugamar	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:rugamarna	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:rugadar	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl+Emph:rugadarsan	NegQ2;
+Auto:rugadh	NegQIrreg;		!!! auto does not lenite

LEXICON VI2-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:béarfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:béarfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:béarfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:béarfar		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:bhéarfas		#;		

LEXICON VI2-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:beireadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:beirinn		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:beirinnse		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:beirteá		NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:beireadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:beirimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beirimisne	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:beireadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:beiridís	NegQ2;
+Auto:beirtí 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI2-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:béarfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:béarfainn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:béarfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:béarfása		NegQ2;
!!+3P+Sg:béarfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:béarfaimis	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl+Emph:béarfaimisne	NegQ2;
!!+2P+Pl:béarfadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:béarfaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:béarfaí 		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI2-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:beire			NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:beirimid		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl+Emph:beirimidne		NegSubj;
+Auto:beirtear		NegSubj;		
